Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 9 Family Preservation and Child Protection

49-5-200 through 49-5-209.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1986, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 435, §§ 14-16; and Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 49; repealed by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1986, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 49/HB 497, effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, reserved the designation of this article.